pt-BR: Carcela tipo: 1 botão; 2 botões; 3 botões; 4 botões; 5 botões; Sem botões (decote V aberto); Zíper inteiro; Meio zíper; Botão de pressão; Outro
de: Art der Knopfleiste: 1 Knopf; 2 Knöpfe; 3 Knöpfe; 4 Knöpfe; 5 Knöpfe; Ohne Knöpfe (offener V-Ausschnitt); Durchgehender Reißverschluss; Halber Reißverschluss; Druckknopf; Sonstige
zh-CN: 门襟类型: 1 粒扣; 2 粒扣; 3 粒扣; 4 粒扣; 5 粒扣; 无扣（V 型领口）; 全拉链; 半拉链; 按扣; 其他
en: Placket type: 1-button; 2-button; 3-button; 4-button; 5-button; Buttonless (open V); Full-zip; Half-zip; Snap; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de carcela: 1 botão; 2 botões; 3 botões; 4 botões; 5 botões; Sem botões (abertura em V); Fecho de correr completo; Meio fecho de correr; Molas; Outra
da: Slidstype: 1 knap; 2 knapper; 3 knapper; 4 knapper; 5 knapper; Uden knapper (åben V); Gennemgående lynlås; Halv lynlås; Trykknap; Andet
el: Τύπος πατιλέτας: 1 κουμπί; 2 κουμπιά; 3 κουμπιά; 4 κουμπιά; 5 κουμπιά; Χωρίς κουμπιά (ανοιχτό V); Φερμουάρ σε όλο το μήκος; Μισό φερμουάρ; Τρουκ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 門襟類型: 1 顆鈕釦; 2 顆鈕釦; 3 顆鈕釦; 4 顆鈕釦; 5 顆鈕釦; 無鈕釦 (V 字開口); 全開式拉鍊; 半開式拉鍊; 按扣; 其他
vi: Kiểu nẹp: 1 khuy; 2 khuy; 3 khuy; 4 khuy; 5 khuy; Không khuy (chữ V mở); Khóa kéo toàn bộ; Khóa kéo một nửa; Khuy bấm; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de fentă de închidere: Cu 1 nasture; Cu 2 nasturi; Cu 3 nasturi; Cu 4 nasturi; Cu 5 nasturi; Fără nasturi (V deschis); Fermoar complet; Jumătate de fermoar; Cu capse; Altele
fr: Type de patte d’ouverture: À 1 bouton; À 2 boutons; À 3 boutons; À 4 boutons; À 5 boutons; Sans bouton (col en V ouvert); Fermeture éclair intégrale; Demi-zip; Bouton-pression; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta obrobe z gumbi: Z 1 gumbom; Z 2 gumboma; S 3 gumbi; S 4 gumbi; S 5 gumbi; Brez gumbov (odprt V-izrez); S celotno zadrgo; S polovično zadrgo; Pritiskač; Drugo
it: Tipo di abbottonatura: 1 bottone; 2 bottoni; 3 bottoni; 4 bottoni; 5 bottoni; Senza bottoni (scollo a V); Zip intera; Mezza zip; Bottone a pressione; Altro
lt-LT: Užsegimo juostos tipas: 1 sagos; 2 sagų; 3 sagų; 4 sagų; 5 sagų; Be sagų (atvira V formos iškirptė); Užtraukiama per visą ilgį; Užtraukiama iki pusės; Spaudės; Kita
ja: 前立てタイプ: 1ボタン; 2ボタン; 3ボタン; 4ボタン; 5ボタン; ボタンなし (オープンV); フルジップ; ハーフジップ; スナップ; その他
pl: Typ plisy: 1 guzik; 2 guziki; 3 guziki; 4 guziki; 5 guzików; Bez guzików (otwarte V); Zamek na całej długości; Zamek do połowy (half-zip); Zatrzaski; Inne
cs: Typ rozparku: 1 knoflík; 2 knoflíky; 3 knoflíky; 4 knoflíky; 5 knoflíků; Bez knoflíků (otevřený výstřih do V); Na zip po celé délce; Na poloviční zip; Na patentky; Jiné
ko: 플래킷 유형: 1버튼; 2버튼; 3버튼; 4버튼; 5버튼; 버튼 없음(오픈 V); 풀 집업; 하프 집업; 스냅; 기타
fi: Halkion tyyppi: 1-napillinen; 2-napillinen; 3-napillinen; 4-napillinen; 5-napillinen; Napiton (avoin V); Kokopitkä vetoketju; Puolipitkä vetoketju; Painonappi; Muu
hu: Gombsor típusa: 1 gombos; 2 gombos; 3 gombos; 4 gombos; 5 gombos; Gomb nélküli (nyitott V); Végig cipzáras; Félig cipzáras; Patentos; Egyéb
sv: Typ av knapplås: 1-knapps; 2-knapps; 3-knapps; 4-knapps; 5-knapps; Utan knappar (öppet V); Hel dragkedja; Halv dragkedja; Tryckknapp; Övrigt
es: Tipo de tapeta: 1 botón; 2 botones; 3 botones; 4 botones; 5 botones; Sin botones (V abierta); Cierre completo; Medio cierre; A presión; Otro
th: แบบกระดุม: 1 กระดุม; 2 กระดุม; 3 กระดุม; 4 กระดุม; 5 กระดุม; ไม่มีกระดุม (คอวีเปิด); ซิปเต็มตัว; ซิปครึ่งตัว; กระดุมแป๊ก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta plakete: 1 gumb; 2 gumba; 3 gumba; 4 gumba; 5 gumba; Bez gumba (otvoreni V-izrez); Patentni zatvarač po cijeloj dužini; Patentni zatvarač do pola; Pritisni gumbi (drukeri); Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ zapínania košele: Na 1 gombík; Na 2 gombíky; Na 3 gombíky; Na 4 gombíky; Na 5 gombíkov; Bez gombíkov (otvorený V-výstrih); Úplný zips; Polovičný zips; Na cvočky; Iné
tr: Patlet tipi: 1 düğmeli; 2 düğmeli; 3 düğmeli; 4 düğmeli; 5 düğmeli; Düğmesiz (açık V); Tam fermuarlı; Yarım fermuarlı; Çıtçıtlı; Diğer
nb: Splitt-type: 1-knapps; 2-knapps; 3-knapps; 4-knapps; 5-knapps; Knappeløs (åpen V); Hel glidelås; Halv glidelås; Trykknapp; Annet
ru: Тип планки: На 1 пуговице; На 2 пуговицах; На 3 пуговицах; На 4 пуговицах; На 5 пуговицах; Без пуговиц (V-образный вырез); На молнии во всю длину; На молнии до середины; На кнопках; Другое
nl: Sluitingstype: 1-knoops; 2-knoops; 3-knoops; 4-knoops; 5-knoops; Zonder knopen (open V-hals); Volledige rits; Halve rits; Drukknoop; Overig
bg-BG: Вид на закопчаването/планката: С 1 копче; С 2 копчета; С 3 копчета; С 4 копчета; С 5 копчета; Без копчета (отворено V); С цял цип; С половин цип; С тик-так копчета; Друго